Colorado, session 2026A, HB1157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of human
services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part VIII as
follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART VIII
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) General Administration
Personal Services 2,817,074 1,832,038 985,036a
(19.3 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 67,995,845 40,392,458 3,863,066b 10,935,103a 12,805,218c
69,702,613 41,330,033 3,970,777b 11,240,184a 13,161,619c
Short-term Disability 267,439 170,821 13,229b 34,885a 48,504c
Paid Family Medical Leave
Insurance 1,719,250 1,098,133 85,042b 224,261a 311,814c
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 38,205,536 24,402,945 1,889,831b 4,983,570a 6,929,190c
Salary Survey 12,032,281 8,410,508 505,351b 1,314,359a 1,802,063c
Step Pay 2,272,768 1,651,181 155,850b 250,808a 214,929c
PERA Direct Distribution 7,379,119 4,980,905 2,398,214a
Shift Differential 13,236,261 5,994,152 528,511b 2,326,707a 4,386,891c
Workers' Compensation 9,753,546 6,058,923 3,694,623a
Operating Expenses 488,844 243,544 244,350a 950c
Legal Services 6,073,577 4,427,638 1,645,939a
Administrative Law Judge
Services 1,644,899 1,217,267 427,632a
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 5,241,275 4,551,775 689,500a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Office of the Ombudsman
for Behavioral Health Access
to Care 555,192 555,192
(5.0 FTE)
169,682,906
171,389,674
a Of these amounts, $17,942,157 $18,204,527 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department
Medicaid-Funded Programs, Human Services, Executive Director's Office line item, $9,730,518 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery
Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., $320,579 shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Personnel, Colorado Equity Office, $232,662 shall be from funds
transferred from the Department of Early Childhood, and $1,929,071 $1,971,782 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
b Of these amounts, $1,855,109 $1,887,315 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $23,301 shall be from the Records and
Reports Fund created in Section 19-1-307 (2.5)(b), C.R.S., and an estimated $5,162,470 $5,237,975 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
c Of these amounts, $1,071,974 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant, an estimated $235,904(I) shall be from the Substance Abuse Prevention and
Treatment Block Grant, and $25,191,681(I) $25,548,082(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
(B) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 1,061,626 862,343a 172,617b 26,666(I)
1,064,975 175,522b 27,110(I)
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from the Colorado Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Cash Fund created in Section 26-21-107 (1), C.R.S., and from the Commission for the Deaf
and Hard of Hearing Cash Fund line item in the Department of Regulatory Agencies, Public Utilities Commission.
170,744,532
172,454,649
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(2) ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
(A) Administration
Personal Services 45,057,694 28,449,368 16,608,326a
(490.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 6,668,206 4,781,454 1,884,998a 1,754(I)
51,725,900
a Of these amounts, an estimated $16,730,273 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
an estimated $1,736,652 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $26,399
shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
(B) Information Technology
IT Project Administration 4,221,265 1,459,316 2,761,949a
(7.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 457,269 269,348 187,921a
Microcomputer Lease
Payments 571,919 160,105 411,814a
County Financial
Management System 1,572,283 385,883 1,186,400a
Client Index Project 17,038 6,554 10,484a
Health Information
Management System 146,611 125,000 21,611b
Payments to OIT 61,610,746 27,724,518 706c 33,885,522a
64,326,085 29,042,784 13,206c 35,257,595a 12,500(I)
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 726,132 726,132
CORE Operations 242,237 130,689 111,548a
IT Systems Interoperability 5,503,473 2,135,337 3,368,136d
3,680,263 312,127
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Enterprise Content
Management 727,520 463,206 264,314a
75,796,493
76,688,622
a These amounts shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, an estimated $12,021 shall be transferred from the Department's Regional Centers and an estimated $9,590 shall be transferred from the Division of Youth Services.
c These amounts are from various sources of cash funds.
d Of this amount, an estimated $1,010,441 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
and an estimated $2,357,695 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(C) Operations
Vehicle Lease Payments 1,603,492 793,828 809,664a
1,314,894 650,972 663,922a
Leased Space 1,780,728 595,779 1,184,949a
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 1,510,654 636,812 873,842a
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payment 6,916,406 6,916,406
Utilities 10,128,145 8,283,374 1,844,771a
21,939,425
21,650,827
a These amounts shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
(D) Special Purpose
Buildings and Grounds
Rental 1,195,501 1,195,501a
(6.5 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
State Garage Fund 780,519 780,519b
(2.6 FTE)
Injury Prevention Program 105,777 70,290 35,487c
SNAP Quality Assurance 1,451,692 694,171 757,521(I)
(15.3 FTE)
Administrative Review Unit 4,599,691 3,706,715 892,976(I)d
(42.4 FTE)
Records and Reports of
Child Abuse and Neglect 440,131 386,261 53,870(I)d
(4.0 FTE)
Quality Assurance Youth
Services 772,351 772,351
(7.0 FTE)
Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of
1996 - Security Remediation 227,776 122,515 105,113c 148(I)d
(1.0 FTE)
2-1-1 Human Services
Referral Service 1,560,581 1,560,581
(1.0 FTE)
11,134,019
a This amount shall be from the Department of Human Services Buildings and Grounds Cash Fund created in Section 26-1-133.5 (2), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from money in the State Garage Fund collected from various Department of Human Services divisions and other state agencies pursuant to Section 24-30-1104
(2)(b), C.R.S.
c Of these amounts, an estimated $138,050 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
and $2,550 shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
d These amounts shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act. These amounts are reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in determining
the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(E) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 478,770 310,182a 36,992b 131,596(I)
486,827 315,402a 37,614b 133,811(I)
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
161,074,607
161,686,195
(3) OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES
(A) Administration 957,695 942,914 4,567a 174b 10,040(I)c
(4.0 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $2,338 shall be from the Colorado Domestic Abuse Program Fund established pursuant to Section 39-22-802 (1), C.R.S., and shall include donations and
money generated from fees pursuant to Section 26-7.5-105, (1)(b), C.R.S., an estimated $1,792(I) shall be from the Youth Services Program Fund created in Section 26-6.8-102 (2)(d),
C.R.S., which is received as a damage award and, as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution, and an estimated
$437 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Youth Mentoring Services Cash Fund created in Section 26-6.8-104 (6), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, an estimated $7,068 shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and an estimated $2,972 shall be from various sources of federal funds.
(B) Division of Child Welfare
Administration 9,895,408 8,444,462 352,543a 1,098,403(I)b
(73.3 FTE)
County IT Support 1,800,000 1,170,000 630,000c
Colorado Trails 8,427,977 5,489,337 49,486d 2,889,154c
Training34 6,924,962 3,746,605 61,224(I)e 3,117,133f
(7.0 FTE)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Foster and Adoptive Parent
Recruitment, Training, and
Support34 1,652,048 1,240,080 411,968(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
Adoption and Relative
Guardianship Assistance 69,058,088 34,529,044 6,905,809(I)e 27,623,235g
87,475,273 44,646,724 7,254,748(I)e 35,573,801g
Child Welfare Services34 448,219,436h 226,170,026 86,898,357i 14,383,230a 120,767,823g
County Level Child Welfare
Staffing 38,133,279 29,316,154 3,833,874(I)e 4,983,251g
Residential Placements for
Children with Intellectual
and Developmental
Disabilities 3,873,228 3,858,488 14,740(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
Child Welfare Prevention
and Intervention Services 598,953 598,953j
Child Welfare Legal
Representation 13,080,928 13,080,928k
Family and Children's
Programs34 73,743,979 51,122,806 10,350,702(I)e 12,270,471(I)l
Collaborative Management
Incentives 6,665,039 2,500,000 3,000,000m 1,165,039n
Collaborative Management
Program Administration and
Evaluation 555,341 555,341
(3.5 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Collaborative Management
Cash Fund 1,165,039 1,165,039
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Independent Living
Programs 2,754,300 2,754,300(I)o
(4.0 FTE)
Federal Child Abuse
Prevention and Treatment
Act Grant 1,800,000 1,800,000(I)p
(3.0 FTE)
Hotline for Child Abuse and
Neglect34 3,545,823 3,495,435 50,388(I)b
(6.0 FTE)
Public Awareness Campaign
for Child Welfare 1,020,671 1,020,671
(1.0 FTE)
Adoption Savings35 1,852,553 1,852,553q
Appropriation to the Foster
Youth Successful Transition
to Adulthood Grant Program
Fund 1,134,609 1,134,609
Foster Youth Successful
Transition to Adulthood
Grant Program 1,134,609 1,134,609r
Fostering Opportunities 1,482,485 1,482,485
Preventing Youth
Homelessness 4,622,202 4,573,816 48,386(I)b
(4.3 FTE)
Child Welfare Licensing 364,606 364,606s
(4.0 FTE)
Community Provider
Incentives 1,780,137 1,780,137
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
High Acuity Treatment and
Services 8,959,171 8,865,202 93,969(I)b
(10.0 FTE)
714,244,871
732,662,056
a These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Children, Youth and Families, Child Welfare Administration and Child Welfare Services line items.
b These amounts shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act. They are reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in determining the amount
to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
c Of these amounts, an estimated $2,374,965(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, an estimated $972,485 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
Block Grant, and $171,704 shall be from Title XX of the Social Security Act.
d This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
e These amounts shall be from local funds. The (L) notation applies to these amounts.
f Of this amount, $2,865,953(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and $251,180 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant.
g Of these amounts, $128,135,943(I) $136,086,509(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, $18,548,592 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant,
$3,886,129(I) shall be from Title IV-B, Subpart 1, of the Social Security Act, and $2,803,645 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant. These amounts
were assumed in developing the appropriated fund source amounts in these line items. The amount from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act is reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111
(2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in determining the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C),
C.R.S.
h For informational purposes, this amount includes $7,355,339 that is anticipated to be initially held out from state and federal funds that are allocated to county departments of social
services for the administration and provision of child welfare services, including the following estimated amounts: $3,208,511 for parental fee reimbursements to counties pursuant to
Section 26-5-104 (2), C.R.S., $2,750,328 for transportation services for foster children and youth pursuant to Section 22-32-138, C.R.S., $950,000 for department-approved child welfare
services that promote the safety and well-being of Native American children and youth, $346,500 for a statewide insurance policy for county-administered foster homes, and $100,000
for contractual services related to the allocation of funds among counties. The remaining $440,864,097 includes the state and federal funds to be allocated to county departments of social
services pursuant to Section 26-5-104, C.R.S., the estimated local share of child welfare services expenditures, and federal Medicaid funds estimated to be available to county departments
of social services for certain expenditures.
i Of this amount, $81,381,777(I) shall be from local funds and subject to the (L) notation and $5,516,580 shall be from the Colorado Long-term Works Reserve created in Section 26-2-721
(1), C.R.S.
j This amount shall be from the Child Welfare Prevention and Intervention Services Cash Fund created in Section 26-5-104 (7)(a)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
k This amount shall be from the Title IV-E Administrative Cost Cash Fund created in Section 26-2-102.5 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S.
l This amount shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and is reflected for informational purposes pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in
determining the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
m This amount shall be from the Collaborative Management Cash Fund created in Section 24-1.9-104 (1), C.R.S.
n This amount shall be from the Collaborative Management Cash Fund created in Section 24-1.9-104 (1), C.R.S.
o This amount shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, including an estimated $2,034,612 for the Chafee Foster Care Independence Program and $719,688 for the Education
and Training Voucher Program.
p This amount shall be from the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act state grant.
q This amount shall be from the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund created in Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
r This amount shall be from the Colorado Foster Youth Successful Transition to Adulthood Grant Program Fund created in Section 19-7-314 (2), C.R.S.
s Of this amount, an estimated $300,012 shall be from the Child Welfare Licensing Cash Fund created in Section 26-6-907 (4)(b), C.R.S., and an estimated $64,594 shall be from the
Records and Reports Fund created in Section 19-1-307 (2.5)(b), C.R.S.
(C) Division of Youth Services
(1) Administration
Program Administration 1,595,192 1,595,192
(12.3 FTE)
Victim Assistance 50,654 50,654a
(0.3 FTE)
1,645,846
a This amount shall be from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506 (1), C.R.S., transferred from the Department of Public Safety, Division
of Criminal Justice, Victims Assistance, State Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Program.
(2) Institutional Programs
Program Administration36 89,585,914 87,687,180 1,320,476(I)a 578,258(I)
(956.5 FTE)
Medical Services 15,119,618 15,119,618
(84.2 FTE)
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Educational Programs 9,576,482 9,090,545 350,413b 135,524(I)
(45.9 FTE)
DYS Education Support 394,042 394,042
Prevention/Intervention
Services 50,886 50,886c
(1.0 FTE)
114,726,942
a This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Education, School District Operations, Nutrition, Federal Nutrition Programs for the federal school breakfast and lunch program.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education, Division of Occupational Education, Area Vocational School Support, and the Department of Education,
School District Operations, Federal and Other Direct Support, Appropriated Sponsored Programs; and Categorical Programs, District Programs Required by Statute, Special Education
Programs for Children with Disabilities.
c This amount shall be transferred from the Behavioral Health Administration, Substance Use Treatment and Prevention Services, Community Prevention and Treatment Programs line
item appropriation.
(3) Community Programs
Program Administration 9,464,999 8,605,555 179,895a 679,549(I)b
(86.9 FTE)
Purchase of Contract
Placements36 6,636,333 5,631,181 538,832a 466,320(I)b
Managed Care Project 1,136,688 1,096,630 40,058a
S.B. 91-094 Programs 16,938,865 13,592,752 3,346,113c
(1.0 FTE)
Parole Program Services 3,388,520 3,388,520
Juvenile Sex Offender Staff
Training 45,548 7,120 38,428d
37,610,953
a These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Children, Youth and Families, Division of Youth Services line item.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b These amounts shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act.
c This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Sex Offender Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-21-103 (3), C.R.S.
(D) Division of Community Programs
Juvenile Parole Board 452,406 322,927 129,479a
(3.2 FTE)
Tony Grampsas Youth
Services Program 11,950,553 2,231,622 9,214,811b 504,120c
(3.0 FTE)
Interagency Prevention
Programs Coordination 156,714 156,714
(1.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the Youth
Mentoring Services Cash
Fund 500,000 500,000d
Domestic Abuse Program 2,034,326 1,404,649e 629,677f
(2.7 FTE)
15,093,999
a This amount shall be from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506 (1), C.R.S., transferred from the Department of Public Safety, Division
of Criminal Justice.
b Of this amount, an estimated $7,557,664(I) shall be from the Youth Services Program Fund created in Section 26-6.8-102 (2)(d), C.R.S., which is received as a damage award and,
as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution, and $1,657,147 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Youth Mentoring Services Cash Fund created in Section 26-6.8-104 (6), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Colorado Domestic Abuse Program Fund established pursuant to Section 39-22-802 (1), C.R.S., and shall include donations and money generated from
fees pursuant to Section 26-7.5-105, (1)(b), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(E) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 14,834,538 284,610a 77,749b 14,472,179c
15,084,159 289,400a 79,057b 14,715,702c
a Of this amount, $183,251 $186,335 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $54,629(I) $55,548(I) shall be from the Youth
Services Program Fund created in Section 26-6.8-102 (2)(d), C.R.S., and an estimated $46,730 $47,517 shall be from various sources of cash funds. The amount from the Youth Services
Program Fund is received as a damage award and, as such, does not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Other, Department of Human Services Indirect Cost Assessment line item.
c Of this amount, $5,919,538 $6,019,146 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant, an estimated $3,530,170(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, an
estimated $223,275(I) shall be from Title IV-B, Subpart 1, of the Social Security Act, and an estimated $4,799,196(I) $4,943,111(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
899,114,844
917,781,650
(4) OFFICE OF ECONOMIC SECURITY
(A) Administration37 2,083,065 702,390 70,607(I)a 240,000b 1,070,068c
(4.0 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $65,559 shall be from the Old Age Pension Fund created in Section 1 of Article XXIV of the State Constitution and an estimated $5,048(L)(I) shall be
from local funds and is shown for informational purposes only.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Administration line item.
c Of this amount, an estimated $269,485 shall be from Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, an estimated $262,065 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block
Grant, an estimated $142,883(I) shall be from the U.S. Department of Agriculture, an estimated $32,240(I) shall be from the federal Department of Health and Human Services, Office
of Energy Assistance, and an estimated $363,395(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Colorado Benefits Management System38
(1) Ongoing Expenses
Personal Services 837,283 374,071 70,162(I)a 393,050b
Centrally Appropriated Items 117,046 52,812 8,134(I)a 56,100b
Operating and Contract
Expenses39 28,818,993 13,657,889 814,969(I)a 27,544c 14,318,591b
CBMS Emergency
Processing Unit 258,870 95,830 163,040(I)d
(4.0 FTE)
30,032,192
a These amounts shall be from the Old Age Pension Fund created in Section 1 of Article XXIV of the State Constitution. For purposes of complying with the limitation on state fiscal
year spending imposed by Section 20, Article X of the State Constitution, this money is included for informational purposes as it is continuously appropriated by Article XXIV of the
State Constitution.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $10,805,464(I) shall be from the U.S. Department of Agriculture for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, an estimated $3,014,373 shall
be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant, and an estimated $947,904(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
c This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
d Of these amounts, an estimated $133,040(I) shall be from the U.S. Department of Agriculture for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and an estimated $30,000(I) shall
be from various sources of federal funds.
(2) Special Projects
Health Care and Economic
Security Staff Development
Center 809,125 284,437 44,264(I)a 168,518b 311,906c
(13.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Old Age Pension Fund created in Section 1 of Article XXIV of the State Constitution. For purposes of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year
spending imposed by Section 20, Article X of the State Constitution, this money is included for informational purposes as it is continuously appropriated by Article XXIV of the State
Constitution.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Executive Director's Office, Information Technology Contracts and
Projects, Colorado Benefits Management Systems, Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center line item.
c Of this amount, an estimated $278,399(I) shall be from the U.S. Department of Agriculture for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and an estimated $33,507 shall be from
the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
(C) Employment and Benefits Division
(1) Administration 4,701,618 4,701,618a
(23.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
(2) Colorado Works Program
County Block Grants40, 41, 42, 43 172,816,036 14,886,272 25,833,887a 132,095,877b
County Training 432,677 432,677b
(2.0 FTE)
Works Program Evaluation 495,440 495,440b
173,744,153
a Of this amount, an estimated $22,149,730(I)(L) shall be from local funds and shall represent the local cash funds expenditure obligation pursuant to Section 26-2-714 (6)(c)(I), C.R.S.,
$3,484,157 shall be from the Colorado Long-term Works Reserve created in Section 26-2-721 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $200,000 shall be from the State's share of cash funds
recoveries, including retained fraud refunds, state revenue intercepts, and other refunds.
b These amounts shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
(3) Other Employment-focused Programs
Workforce Development
Council 111,211 111,211a
Transitional Jobs Program 2,609,003 2,609,003
(2.0 FTE)
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Child Support Services
Program 1,153,648 1,153,648a
(1.0 FTE)
Food Stamp Job Search
Units - Program Costs 2,169,707 213,031 413,436b 1,543,240(I)
(6.2 FTE)
Food Stamp Job Search
Units - Supportive Services 261,452 78,435 52,291b 130,726(I)
Employment Opportunities
With Wages Program 2,000,000 2,000,000a
Refugee Assistance 2,945,737 2,945,737a
Stable Housing for Survivors 2,000,000 2,000,000c
(1.5 FTE)
13,250,758
a These amounts shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $264,927(L)(I) shall be from county matching funds and an estimated $200,800 shall be from in-kind donations.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado Long-term Works Reserve created in Section 26-2-721 (1), C.R.S.
(4) Adult Financial Programs
Program Administration 555,148 426,893 128,255a
(6.9 FTE)
Cash Assistance Programs 78,905,051 78,905,051(I)b
Refunds 588,362 588,362a
OAP Burial Reimbursements 918,364 918,364(I)b
State Administration 637,062 637,062(I)b
(3.5 FTE)
County Administration 2,566,974 2,566,974(I)b
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Administration - Home Care
Allowance SEP Contract 956,933 956,933
Aid to the Needy Disabled
Programs 13,394,238 7,654,065 5,740,173c
Other Burial
Reimbursements 508,000 402,985 105,015(I)d
Home Care Allowance 967,171 850,370 116,801(I)d
SSI Stabilization Fund
Programs 1,000,000 1,000,000(I)e
100,997,303
a These amounts shall be from various sources of cash funds, including refunds and state revenue intercepts.
b These amounts shall be from the Old Age Pension Fund pursuant to Section 1, Article XXIV, of the State Constitution. For purposes of complying with the limitation on state fiscal
year spending imposed by Section 20, Article X of the State Constitution, this money is included for informational purposes as it is continuously appropriated by Article XXIV of the
State Constitution.
c Of this amount, an estimated $2,863,687(L)(I) shall be from local funds, an estimated $2,279,944 shall be from federal interim assistance reimbursement payments, and an estimated
$596,542 shall be from other refunds and state revenue intercepts.
d This amount shall be from local funds and the (L) notation applies to these amounts.
e This amount shall be from the State Supplemental Security Income Stabilization Fund, created pursuant to Section 26-2-210 (1), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes
only, as the State Supplemental Security Income Stabilization Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Human Services for qualified expenditures pursuant to Section
26-2-210 (1), C.R.S.
(D) Food and Energy Assistance
Low Income Energy
Assistance Program 44,019,430 44,019,430(I)
(5.2 FTE)
Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program
Administration37 3,879,717 1,860,372 2,019,345(I)
4,079,579 99,931f 2,119,276(I)
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(22.6 FTE)
(24.2 FTE)
Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program State
Staff Training 25,000 12,500 12,500(I)
Food Distribution Program 1,360,978 164,445 667,674(I)a 528,859(I)
(10.9 FTE)
Food Assistance Grant
Programs 2,000,000 2,000,000
9,000,000 9,000,000
Income Tax Offset 4,128 2,064 2,064(I)
Electronic Benefits Transfer
Service 3,262,445 724,924 1,032,226(I)b 35,701c 1,469,594d
(7.0 FTE)
Systematic Alien
Verification for Eligibility 187,945 29,665 2,541(I)b 116,804e 38,935d
(1.0 FTE)
Colorado Diaper Distribution
Program 1,509,197 1,509,197
(2.0 FTE)
Summer Electronic Benefits
Transfer for Children
Program 3,604,888 1,801,887 1,803,001(I)
(4.0 FTE)
59,853,728
67,053,590
a This amount shall be from the Food Distribution Program Service Fund created in Section 26-1-121 (4)(b), C.R.S. The amount is shown for informational purposes as it is continuously
appropriated pursuant to Section 26-1-121 (4)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of these amounts, an estimated $753,415(L)(I) shall be from local funds and is shown for informational purposes only, and an estimated $281,352 shall be from the Old Age Pension
Fund established in Section 1, Article XXIV, of the State Constitution. For purposes of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20, Article X,
of the State Constitution, the Old Age Pension Fund money are included for informational purposes as they are continuously appropriated by Article XXIV of the State Constitution.
c This amount shall be from fund transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
d Of these amounts, an estimated $212,889 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant and an estimated $1,295,640(I) shall be from various sources of
federal funds.
e This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Systematic Alien Verification for Eligibility line item.
f THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE FROM THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL PROGRAM FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-82.9-211 (2)(a), C.R.S.
(E) Child Support Services
Automated Child Support
Enforcement System 10,338,150 3,008,705 877,141a 6,452,304b
(22.9 FTE)
Child Support Services40 3,511,496 1,066,173 182,026c 2,263,297b
(31.5 FTE)
Child Support Payment
Pass-through
Reimbursements 4,800,000 4,800,000
18,649,646
a Of this amount, an estimated $304,999 shall be from the state's share of retained child support collections and fraud refunds, an estimated $281,509 shall be from the federal government's
share of revenues earned on funds in the Family Support Registry Fund created in Section 26-13-115.5 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $146,983 shall be from the State's share of revenues
earned on funds in the Family Support Registry Fund, and an estimated $143,650 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from Title IV-D of the Social Security Act.
c Of this amount, an estimated $122,996 shall be from the Child Support Insurance Lien Fund created in Section 26-13-122.7 (9), C.R.S., and an estimated $59,030 shall be from the
state's share of retained child support collections and fraud refunds.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(F) County Administration
County Administration44 104,504,574 34,091,086(M) 20,900,916(I)a 49,512,572b
County Tax Base Relief 3,879,756 3,879,756
County Share of Offsetting
Revenues 2,986,000 2,986,000c
County Incentive Payments40 4,113,000 4,113,000d
115,483,330
a This amount shall be from local funds and the (L) notation applies to this amount.
b This amount shall be from various sources of federal funds.
c This amount shall be from the counties' share of offsetting cash funds revenues, including retained child support collections, retained fraud refunds, state revenue intercepts, and other
refunds pursuant to Section 26-13-108, C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the State's share of retained child support collections and fraud refunds, pursuant to Section 26-13-108, C.R.S.
(G) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 30,798,736 148,162a 8,227,384b 22,423,190c
31,316,983 150,655a 8,365,826b 22,800,502c
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Other, Department of Human Services Indirect Cost Assessment line item.
c Of this amount, $4,784,460 $4,864,967 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant, an estimated $3,473,137(I) shall be from Titles II and XVI of the Social
Security Act, an estimated $3,302,367(I) shall be from the U.S. Department of Agriculture, an estimated $3,052,763shall be from Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, and an estimated
$7,810,463(I) $8,107,268(I) shall be from various sources of federal funds.
550,403,654
558,121,763
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(5) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
(A) Community Behavioral Health Administration
Program Administration 23,239,311 10,838,679 4,120,877a 926,843b 7,352,912(I)
(160.1 FTE)
Behavioral Health Capacity
Tracking System 42,611 42,611a
Behavioral Health
Workforce Learning
Management System 773,935 773,935
(1.0 FTE)
24,055,857
a Of these amounts, $1,262,271 shall be funds transferred from the Alcohol and Drug Driving Safety Program created in Section 42-4-1301.3 (4)(a), C.R.S., $1,232,769 shall be from
the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $826,263 shall be from the Persistent Drunk Driver Cash Fund created in Section 42-3-303 (1), C.R.S., $420,977
shall be from the Behavioral Health Licensing Cash Fund created in Section 27-50-506, C.R.S., $200,000 shall be from the Cigarette, Tobacco Product, and Nicotine Produce Use by
Minors Prevention Fund created in Section 44-7-107, $99,179 shall be from patient revenues collected by the Mental Health Institutes, $33,919 shall be from the Law Enforcement
Assistance Fund created in Section 43-4-401, C.R.S., $16,488 shall be from the Addiction Counselor Training Fund created in Section 27-80-111 (2), C.R.S., $14,711 shall be from the
Controlled Substances Program Fund created in Section 27-80-206, C.R.S., $4,800 shall be from the Peer Support Professional Workforce Cash Fund created in Section 27-60-108 (6)(a),
C.R.S., and $52,111 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Community Behavioral Health Administration line item.
(B) Community-based Mental Health Services
Mental Health Community
Programs 52,063,993 30,063,993 22,000,000(I)
Assertive Community
Treatment Programs and
Other Alternatives to the
Mental Health Institutes45 18,366,392 18,366,392
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Mental Health Services for
Juvenile and Adult Offenders 6,210,075 6,210,075a
Children and Youth Mental
Health Treatment Act 8,110,513 7,519,135 453,698a 137,680b
Family First Prevention
Services Act 663,253 663,253
Behavioral Health Vouchers 50,000 50,000
Veterans Mental Health
Services 5,000,000 5,000,000c
90,464,226
a These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Children and Youth Mental Health Treatment Act line item.
c This amount shall be from the Behavioral and Mental Health Cash Fund created in Section 24-75-230 (2)(a), C.R.S., from revenue received pursuant to Section 24-75-230 (3.5), C.R.S.
(C) Substance Use Treatment and Prevention Services
Treatment and Detoxification
Programs46 51,392,307 15,871,526 5,520,781a 30,000,000(I)
(2.1 FTE)
Increasing Access to
Effective Substance Use
Disorder Services (SB
16-202) 16,938,566 16,938,566b
Prevention Programs 7,051,149 51,149c 7,000,000(I)
Community Prevention and
Treatment Programs 2,583,275 2,583,275d
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Housing Assistance for
Individuals with a Substance
Use Disorder 4,000,000 4,000,000
(1.0 FTE)
Offender Services 3,318,616 3,318,616
Recovery Residence
Certification Program 200,000 200,000
Fentanyl Education Program 25,000 25,000e
Study on the Health Effects
of Criminal Penalties 52,963 52,963e
85,561,876
a Of this amount, $5,325,126 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $195,655 shall be from the Adolescent Substance Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 18-13-122 (18), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $41,149 shall be from the Adolescent Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 18-13-122 (18), C.R.S., and $10,000 shall be from the
Cigarette, Tobacco Product, and Nicotine Product Use by Minors Prevention Fund created in Section 44-7-107 (1), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $1,534,596 shall be from the Persistent Drunk Driver Cash Fund created in Section 42-3-303 (1), C.R.S., $642,479 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $255,000 shall be from the Law Enforcement Assistance Fund created in Section 43-4-401, C.R.S., and $151,200 shall be from the Rural Alcohol
and Substance Abuse Cash Fund created in Section 27-80-117 (3)(a), C.R.S.
e These amounts shall be from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S.
(D) Integrated Behavioral Health Services
Behavioral Health Crisis
Response System Services 40,037,978 31,527,708 7,346,832a 1,163,438(I)
Behavioral Health Crisis
Response System Secure
Transportation Pilot
Programs 594,572 594,572b
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Behavioral Health Crisis
Response System Telephone
Hotline 3,863,938 3,496,622 367,316b
Behavioral Health Crisis
Response System Public
Information Campaign 792,075 792,075
Community Transition
Services 7,945,867 7,945,867
Criminal Justice Diversion
Programs 7,954,471 1,740,348 6,214,123b
(1.0 FTE) (1.3 FTE)
Jail-based Behavioral Health
Services 16,241,451 7,241,451 9,000,000c
Circle Program and Other
Rural Treatment Programs
for People with Co-occurring
Disorders47 6,467,949 638,286 5,829,663b
Recovery Support Services
Grant Program 1,600,000 1,600,000
(1.0 FTE)
Care Coordination 1,751,331 1,751,331
988 Crisis Hotline 12,584,264 12,584,264(I)d
(2.0 FTE)
School Mental Health
Screening Program 2,536,706 2,536,706
Youth Mental Health
Services Program 5,002,872 5,002,872
(1.0 FTE)
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Medication Consistency and
Health Information
Exchange 760,700 760,700b
108,134,174
a Of this amount, $4,346,832 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $3,000,000 shall be from the Behavioral and Mental Health
Cash Fund created in Section 24-75-230 (2)(a), C.R.S. from revenue received pursuant to Section 24-75-230 (3.7), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be transferred from the Judicial Department, Probation and Related Services, from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Expenditures line item appropriation.
d This amount shall be from the 988 Crisis Hotline Cash Fund created in Section 27-64-104 (1), C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes only as the cash fund is continuously
appropriated pursuant to Section 27-64-104 (3), C.R.S.
(E) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 3,658,039 1,952,537a 58,198b 1,647,304(I)
3,719,593 1,985,392a 59,178b 1,675,023(I)
a Of this amount $1,699,313 $1,727,907 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $253,224 $257,485 shall be from various sources
of cash funds.
b This amount shall be Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs, Other,
Department of Human Services Indirect Cost Assessment line item.
311,874,172
311,935,726
(6) OFFICE OF CIVIL AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH
(A) Administration
Administration 939,071 939,071
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Electronic Health Record and
Pharmacy System 2,871,718 2,871,718
3,810,789
(B) Mental Health Institute at Ft. Logan48
Personal Services 55,176,947
50,065,321
(385.6 FTE)
(352.8 FTE)
Contract Medical Services 1,003,297
Operating Expenses 2,545,364
Capital Outlay 112,916
Pharmaceuticals 1,975,007
60,813,531 58,537,788 2,071,316a 204,427b
55,701,905 53,224,319 406,270b
a Of this amount, $1,749,686 shall be from Medicare and other sources of patient revenues, and $321,630 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501
(1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from patient revenues. For informational purposes only, patient revenues are estimated to include $106,191 earned from regional accountable entities through
the Behavioral Health Capitation Payments line item appropriation, and $98,236 $300,079 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and
Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs, Human Services, Office of Civil and Forensic Mental Health, Mental Health Institutes line item.
(C) Mental Health Institute at Pueblo48
Personal Services 138,237,300
(1,059.0 FTE)
Contract Medical Services 2,784,664
Operating Expenses 9,038,217
Capital Outlay 324,068
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Pharmaceuticals 4,714,182
Educational Programs 236,402
(2.7 FTE)
155,334,833 137,431,180 4,878,719a 13,024,934b
135,380,969 15,075,145b
a Of this amount, $4,254,216 shall be from Medicare and other sources of patient revenues, and $624,503 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501
(1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $8,692,390 shall be from patient revenues, $4,127,236 shall be transferred from the Department of Corrections, and $205,308 shall be transferred from the Department
of Education. For informational purposes only, patient revenues are estimated to include $8,664,643 $10,714,854 Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy
and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs, Human Services, Office of Civil and Forensic Mental Health, Mental Health Institutes line item.
(D) Forensic Services48
Forensic Services
Administration 1,328,736 1,328,736
(15.9 FTE)
Forensic Support Team 2,551,541 2,551,541
(28.0 FTE)
Court Services 8,984,890 8,984,890
(67.6 FTE)
Forensic Community-based
Services 4,560,186 4,560,186
(20.4 FTE)
Jail-based Competency
Restoration Program 14,856,519 14,856,519
(5.3 FTE)
Purchased Psychiatric Bed
Capacity 29,860,801 29,860,801
(1.0 FTE)
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Outpatient Competency
Restoration Program 4,513,757 4,513,757
(3.0 FTE)
Quality Assurance 393,605 393,605
(6.0 FTE)
67,050,035
(E) Consent Decree Fines and Fees48
Fines and Fees 12,508,556 12,508,556
(F) Residential Behavioral Health Beds
Mental Health Transitional
Living Homes 17,145,935 11,980,905 5,165,030a
(53.2 FTE)
a This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Civil and Forensic Mental Health, Mental Health Transitional Living Homes line item.
(G) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 3,494,888 1,945,295a 1,549,593b
3,553,697 1,978,028a 1,575,669b
a This amount shall be from Medicare and other sources of patient revenues earned by the mental health institutes.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Other, Department of Human Services Indirect Cost Assessment line item.
320,158,567
315,105,750
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(7) OFFICE OF ADULTS, AGING, AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(A) Administration 1,805,733 803,798 367,536a 508,615b 125,784(I)
(8.9 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $361,043(I) shall be from the shall be from the Central Fund for Veterans Community Living Centers created in Section 26-12-108 (1)(a), C.R.S., an
estimated $1,872 shall be from the Colorado Brain Injury Trust Fund created in Section 26-1-309 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $4,621 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, $503,562 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded
Programs, Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Administration line item, and $5,053 shall be from the Colorado Commission for the Deaf and Hard of
Hearing Cash Fund created in Section 26-21-107 (1), C.R.S., and from the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Cash Fund line item in the Department of Regulatory Agencies,
Public Utilities Commission.
(B) Programs and Commissions for Persons with Disabilities
Developmental Disabilities
Council 1,104,118 1,104,118(I)
(6.0 FTE)
Colorado Commission for
the Deaf, Hard of Hearing,
and DeafBlind 3,413,703 3,413,703a
(13.8 FTE)
Brain Injury Program -
Appropriation to the
Colorado Brain Injury Trust
Fund 450,000 450,000
Colorado Brain Injury Trust
Fund 3,592,142 3,142,117b 450,025c
(1.5 FTE)
8,559,963
a This amount shall be from the Colorado Commission for the Deaf, Hard of Hearing, and DeafBlind Cash Fund created in Section 26-21-107 (1), C.R.S., and from the Commission for
the Deaf, Hard of Hearing, and DeafBlind Cash Fund line item in the Department of Regulatory Agencies, Public Utilities Commission.
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount shall be from the Colorado Brain Injury Trust Fund created in Section 26-1-309 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado Brain Injury Trust Fund created in Section 26-1-309 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities
(1) Administration
Regional Centers Electronic
Health Record System 698,688 698,688a
a Of this amount, $680,382 shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded
Programs, Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities line item and $18,306 shall be transferred
from the Department of Human Services' Regional Centers.
(2) Wheat Ridge Regional Center
Wheat Ridge Regional
Center Intermediate Care
Facility49 27,612,893 877,774a 26,735,119b
(369.0 FTE)
Wheat Ridge Regional
Center Provider Fee 1,435,612 1,435,612b
Wheat Ridge Regional
Center Depreciation 180,718 180,718b
29,229,223
a This amount shall be from client cash revenues.
b These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities line item.
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) Grand Junction Regional Center
Grand Junction Regional
Center Intermediate Care
Facility49 7,752,295 1,141,283a 6,611,012b
(98.8 FTE)
Grand Junction Regional
Center Provider Fee 453,291 453,291b
Grand Junction Regional
Center Waiver Services50 12,236,565 350,322 537,083a 11,349,160b
(174.2 FTE)
Grand Junction Regional
Center Depreciation 323,681 323,681b
20,765,832
a These amounts shall be from client cash revenues.
b These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities line item..
(4) Pueblo Regional Center
Pueblo Regional Center
Waiver Services50 12,627,837 250,195 573,598a 11,804,044b
(181.8 FTE)
Pueblo Regional Center
Depreciation 187,326 187,326(I)b
12,815,163
a This amount shall be from client cash revenues.
b These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities line item.
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(5) Work Therapy Program 613,091 613,091a
(1.5 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Work Therapy Cash Fund created in Section 26-8-107 (2)(a), C.R.S.
(D) Veterans Community Living Centers
Administration 1,723,048 1,723,048(I)a
(5.0 FTE)
Fitzsimons Veterans
Community Living Center 24,814,803 977,719 12,179,141(I)a 11,657,943(I)
(236.4 FTE)
Florence Veterans
Community Living Center 12,802,608 523,072 7,823,446(I)a 4,456,090(I)
(135.0 FTE)
Homelake Veterans
Community Living Center 8,816,903 575,451 5,257,383(I)a 2,984,069(I)
(95.3 FTE)
Homelake Military Veterans
Cemetery 74,385 66,720 7,665(I)a
(0.5 FTE)
Rifle Veterans Community
Living Center 10,506,943 630,950 7,240,792(I)a 2,635,201(I)
(110.6 FTE)
Walsenburg Veterans
Community Living Center 373,985 373,985(I)a
(1.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the Central
Fund Pursuant to Section
26-12-108 (1)(a.5), C.R.S. 800,000 800,000
59,912,675
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts are shown for informational purposes only and shall be from the Central Fund for Veterans Community Living Centers created in Section 26-12-108 (1)(a), C.R.S. These
amounts reflect estimated operating costs for the veterans community living centers that are funded with resident payments for care and other revenues. The veterans community living
centers have continuous spending authority pursuant to Sections 26-12-108 and 110, C.R.S. The veterans community living centers and Homelake Domiciliary are also anticipated to
qualify as enterprises as defined by Section 20, Article X of the State Constitution.
(E) Disability
Determination Services 22,906,247 22,906,247(I)
(121.7 FTE)
(F) Aging Programs
(1) Adult Protective Services
State Administration 1,573,883 1,503,791 70,092a
(11.6 FTE)
Adult Protective Services44 21,451,831 14,867,037 4,290,346(I)b 2,294,448c
Adult Protective Services
Data System 156,154 133,754 22,400a
Records and Reports of
At-Risk Adult Abuse or
Neglect 645,288 645,288a
(7.5 FTE)
23,827,156
a These amounts shall be from the Records and Reports Fund created in Section 19-1-307 (2.5)(b), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from local funds. The (L) notation and the (I) notation apply to this amount.
c This amount shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant.
(2) Community Services for the Elderly
Program Administration 1,482,658 355,604 1,127,054(I)a
(8.0 FTE)
PAGE 34-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Senior Community Services
Employment 863,034 863,034(I)b
(0.5 FTE)
Older Americans Act
Programs51 20,918,207 990,653 3,079,710c 16,847,844(I)a
National Family Caregiver
Support Program 2,173,936 142,041 423,805(I)d 1,608,090(I)a
State Ombudsman Program 769,476 607,840 1,800e 159,836(I)f
(1.0 FTE)
State Funding for Senior
Services51 26,856,865 14,487,707 11,369,158g 1,000,000e
Contingency Funding for
Senior Services 680,000 680,000h
Area Agencies on Aging
Administration 1,375,384 1,375,384(I)a
Respite Services 398,370 350,000 48,370i
Strategic Action Plan on
Aging 102,335 102,335
(1.0 FTE)
55,620,265
a These amounts shall be from Title III of the Older Americans Act and is shown for informational purposes only. A state match is required to expend these funds, except in the Area
Agencies on Aging Administration line item, where local expenditures provide the required non-federal match.
b This amount shall be from Title V of the Older Americans Act and is shown for informational purposes only.
c Of this amount, an estimated $3,039,710(L)(I) shall be from local funds and an estimated $40,000 shall be from the Older Coloradans Cash Fund created in Section 26-11-205.5 (5)(a),
C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from local funds and the (L) notation applies to this amount.
e These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Human Services, Office of Adults, Aging, and Disability Services, Community Services for the Elderly line item.
PAGE 35-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
f This amount shall be from Title III and Title VII of the Older Americans Act and is shown for informational purposes only. A state match is required to expend these funds, except
in the Area Agencies on Aging Administration line item, where local expenditures provide the required non-federal match.
g This amount shall be from the Older Coloradans Cash Fund created in Section 26-11-205.5 (5)(a), C.R.S.
h This amount shall be from the State Funding for Senior Services Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 26-11-209 (2), C.R.S.
i This amount shall be from the Crimes Against At-Risk Persons Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-6.5-107 (4)(a), C.R.S.
(G) Indirect Cost
Assessment33 18,552,515 4,128,843a 14,204,716b 218,956(I)
18,879,209 4,212,830a 14,443,738b 222,641(I)
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b This amount shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs,
Other, Department of Human Services Indirect Cost Assessment line item.
255,306,551
255,633,245
TOTALS PART VIII
(HUMAN SERVICES) $2,668,676,927 $1,323,288,949 $454,233,575a $235,269,773b $655,884,630c
$2,692,718,978 $1,333,332,724 $454,964,734a $239,462,594b $664,958,926c
a Of this amount, $157,446,786 $157,795,725 contains an (L) notation and $298,591,203 $298,937,171 contains an (I) notation and are included for informational purposes only.
b Of this amount, $1,320,476 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
c Of this amount, $409,427,464 $418,321,645 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 36-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
33 Department of Human Services, Executive Director's Office, Indirect Cost Assessment; Administration and Finance, Indirect Cost Assessment; Office of
Children, Youth and Families, Indirect Cost Assessment; Office of Economic Security, Indirect Cost Assessment; Behavioral Health Administration, Indirect
Cost Assessment; Office of Civil and Forensic Mental Health, Indirect Cost Assessment; Office of Adult, Aging, and Disability Services, Indirect Cost
Assessment -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total
appropriations in these subsections among line items in these subsections.
34 Department of Human Services, Office of Children, Youth and Families, Division of Child Welfare, Training; Foster and Adoptive Parent Recruitment,
Training and Support; Child Welfare Services; Family and Children's Programs; Hotline for Child Abuse and Neglect -- It is the General Assembly's intent
to encourage counties to serve children in the most appropriate and least restrictive manner. For this purpose, the Department may transfer funds between the
specified line items in the Division of Child Welfare.
35 Department of Human Services, Office of Children, Youth and Families, Division of Child Welfare, Adoption Savings -- It is the General Assembly's intent,
in order to improve permanency outcomes and reduce the administrative burden on state agencies and counties, that $340,000 of the appropriation be used
to support contracts with non-governmental program providers that assist with placement services for foster youth.
36 Department of Human Services, Office of Children, Youth and Families, Division of Youth Services, Institutional Programs, Program Administration;
Community Programs, Purchase of Contract Placements -- The Department is authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of the total appropriations within the
line items designated with this footnote.
37 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Administration; Food and Energy Assistance, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
Administration -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department is authorized to transfer up to 5.0 percent of the
total appropriations between these line items.
38 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Colorado Benefits Management System -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in
Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department is authorized to transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriations in this subsection among line items in this
subsection. The Department is also authorized to transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriations in this subsection to the following line item appropriations
within the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing: Executive Director's Office, Information Technology Contracts and Projects, Colorado Benefits
Management Systems, Operating and Contract Expenses and Colorado Benefits Management System, Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development
Center.
PAGE 37-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
39 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Colorado Benefits Management System , Ongoing Expenses, Operating and Contract Expenses
-- Of this appropriation, $2,500,000 remains available for expenditure until the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
40 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Employment and Benefits Division, Colorado Works Program, County Block Grants; Child
Support Services, Child Support Services; County Administration, County Incentive Payments -- As required by Sections 26-13-108 and 26-13-112.5 (2),
C.R.S., the Department shall distribute child support incentive payments to counties. Further, all of the State share of recoveries of amounts of support for
public assistance recipients, less annual appropriations from this fund source for state child support enforcement operations, shall be distributed to counties,
as described in Sections 26-13-108 and 26-2-108, C.R.S. If the total amount of the State share of recoveries is greater than the total annual appropriations from
this fund source, the Department is authorized to distribute to counties, for county incentive payments, the actual State share of any additional recoveries.
41 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Employment and Benefits Division, Colorado Works Program, County Block Grants -- As
required by Sections 26-2-714 (7) and 26-2-714 (9), C.R.S., under certain conditions, a county may transfer federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
(TANF) funds within its Colorado Works Program Block Grant to the federal child care development fund or to programs funded by Title XX of the federal
Social Security Act. One of the conditions specified is that the amount a county transfers must be specified by the Department of Human Services as being
available for transfer within the limitation imposed by federal law. The Department may allow individual counties to transfer a greater percent of federal TANF
funds than the state is allowed under federal law as long as: (a) Each county has had an opportunity to transfer an amount up to the federal maximum allowed;
and, (b) the total amount transferred statewide does not exceed the federal maximum.
42 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Employment and Benefits Division, Colorado Works Program, County Block Grants -- The
appropriation of local funds for Colorado Works program county block grants may be decreased by a maximum of $100,000 to reduce one or more small
counties' fiscal year 2025-26 targeted or actual spending level pursuant to Section 26-2-714 (8), C.R.S.
43 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, Employment and Benefits Division, Colorado Works Program, County Block Grants -- The
Department may comply with the provisions of Section 26-2-714 (10), C.R.S., by reducing required county Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF)
maintenance of effort expenditures in the fiscal year after the State is notified that it has met federal work participation rates and qualifies for a percent
reduction in the state's maintenance of effort. If the State is notified during the 2025-26 state fiscal year that it has met federal work participation rates for a
prior year and therefore qualifies for a percent reduction in the state's maintenance of effort, local cash funds expenditure obligations that are established in
this line item pursuant to Section 26-2-714 (6) (c) (I), C.R.S., shall be reduced by $5,524,726.
44 Department of Human Services, Office of Economic Security, County Administration, County Administration; and Office of Adult, Aging and Disability
Services, Aging Programs, Adult Protective Services, Adult Protective Services -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S.,
any amount in the Adult Protective Services line item that is not required for the provision of adult protective services may be transferred to the County
PAGE 38-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Administration line item and used to provide additional benefits under that program. Further, if county spending exceeds the total appropriations from the
Adult Protective Services line item, any amount in the County Administration line item that is not required for the provision of services under that program
may be transferred to the Adult Protective Services line item and used to provide adult protective services.
45 Department of Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Community-based Mental Health Services, Assertive Community Treatment Programs
and Other Alternatives to the Mental Health Institutes -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $576,050 of this General Fund appropriation be allocated to
a community mental health center in western Colorado for the purpose of providing behavioral health services for individuals who seek care from the
emergency department of a regional medical center and who are diagnosed with physical health conditions that may be exacerbated by co-occurring mental
health conditions.
46 Department of Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Substance Use Treatment and Prevention Services, Treatment and Detoxification Programs
-- It is the General Assembly's intent that this appropriation be used to provide services and to expand access to residential treatment services for individuals
with substance use disorders, including initial expenses necessary to establish, license, and begin operating one or more programs that provide these services,
such as building renovations, furnishings, and equipment.
47 Department of Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Integrated Behavioral Health Services, Circle Program and Other Rural Treatment
Programs for People with Co-occurring Disorders -- It is the General Assembly's intent that this appropriation be used to: support the community-based Circle
Program; support the provision of a full continuum of co-occurring behavioral health treatment services in southern Colorado and the Arkansas Valley; and
expand access to residential treatment services in one or more rural areas of Colorado for individuals with co-occurring mental health and substance use
disorders. It is also the General Assembly's intent that the appropriation may be used to provide services and to cover initial expenses necessary to establish,
license, and begin operating one or more programs that provide these services, such as building renovations, furnishing, and equipment.
48 Department of Human Services, Office of Civil and Forensic Mental Health, Mental Health Institute at Ft. Logan; Mental Health Institute at Pueblo; Forensic
Services; Consent Decree Fines and Fees -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to
5.0 percent of the total appropriations in these subsections among line items in these subsections.
49 Department of Human Services, Office of Adult, Aging and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities, Wheat Ridge
Regional Center, Wheat Ridge Regional Center Intermediate Care Facility; Grand Junction Regional Center, Grand Junction Regional Center Intermediate
Care Facility -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total
appropriation for Intermediate Care Facilities between the Wheat Ridge Regional Center and the Grand Junction Regional Center.
PAGE 39-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
50 Department of Human Services, Office of Adult, Aging and Disability Services, Regional Centers for People with Developmental Disabilities, Grand Junction
Regional Center, Grand Junction Regional Center Waiver Services; and Pueblo Regional Center, Pueblo Regional Center Waiver Services -- In addition to
the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriation for Regional Center
waiver services between the Grand Junction Regional Center and the Pueblo Regional Center.
51 Department of Human Services, Office of Adult, Aging and Disability Services, Aging Programs, Community Services for the Elderly, Older Americans Act
Programs; State Funding for Senior Services -- Amounts in the Older Americans Act Programs line item are calculated based on a requirement for a non-federal
match of at least 15 percent, including a 5.0 percent state match, pursuant to Title III of the federal Older Americans Act. In addition to the transfer authority
provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department is authorized to transfer General Fund and cash funds from the State Funding for Senior Services line
item to the Older Americans Act Programs line item to comply with the 5.0 percent state match requirement for the Older Americans Act Programs. This
appropriation is based on the assumption that all federal Title III funds requiring a state match that are not for purposes of administration or included in the
appropriations for other line items will be expended from the Older Americans Act Programs line item.
PAGE 40-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter 519,
(HB 24-1430), amend Part VIII (3)(B) and the affected totals as Part VIII (3)(B) and the affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of chapter 458, (SB
25-095), as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VIII
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
(3) OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES
(B) Division of Child Welfare
Administration 9,394,512 7,949,044 350,837a 1,094,631(I)b
(73.3 FTE)
County IT Support 1,800,000 1,170,000 630,000c
Colorado Trails 8,436,769 5,495,052 49,486d 2,892,231c
Training41 6,884,413 3,726,651 61,224(I)e 3,096,538f
(7.0 FTE)
Foster and Adoptive Parent
Recruitment, Training, and
Support41 1,643,222 1,231,254 411,968(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
Adoption and Relative
Guardianship Assistance 49,533,568 29,422,543 5,781,558(I)e 14,329,467g
54,920,736 32,879,954 5,066,022(I)e 16,974,760g
Child Welfare Services41 413,457,960h 218,510,216 77,403,994(I)e 14,383,230a 103,160,520g
County Level Child Welfare
Staffing 38,133,279 29,316,154 3,833,874(I)e 4,983,251g
Residential Placements for
Children with Intellectual
and Developmental
Disabilities 3,865,658 3,850,918 14,740(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
PAGE 41-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Child Welfare Prevention
and Intervention Services 598,953 598,953i
Child Welfare Legal
Representation 13,082,799 13,082,799j
Family and Children's
Programs41 60,743,979 51,122,806 6,350,702(I)e 3,270,471(I)k
Collaborative Management
Incentives 6,665,039 2,500,000 3,000,000l 1,165,039m
Collaborative Management
Program Administration and
Evaluation 550,218 550,218
(3.5 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Collaborative Management
Cash Fund 1,165,039 1,165,039
Independent Living
Programs 2,725,624 2,725,624(I)n
(4.0 FTE)
Federal Child Abuse
Prevention and Treatment
Act Grant 545,183 545,183(I)o
(3.0 FTE)
Hotline for Child Abuse and
Neglect41 3,492,513 3,442,125 50,388(I)b
(6.0 FTE)
Public Awareness Campaign
for Child Welfare 1,016,467 1,016,467
(1.0 FTE)
Adoption Savings42 1,852,553 1,852,553p
PAGE 42-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Appropriation to the Foster
Youth Successful Transition
to Adulthood Grant Program
Fund 1,134,609 1,134,609
Foster Youth Successful
Transition to Adulthood
Grant Program 1,134,609 1,134,609q
Fostering Opportunities 1,582,485 1,582,485
Preventing Youth
Homelessness 4,620,978 4,572,592 48,386(I)b
(4.3 FTE)
Child Welfare Licensing 348,761 348,761r
(4.0 FTE)
Community Provider
Incentives 1,780,137 1,780,137
High Acuity Treatment and
Services 5,900,000 5,900,000s
642,089,327
647,476,492
a These amounts shall be from Medicaid funds transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Department of Human Services Medicaid-funded Programs.
b These amounts shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act. They are reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in determining the amount
to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
c Of these amounts, an estimated $2,378,042(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, an estimated $972,485 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
Block Grant, and $171,704 shall be from Title XX of the Social Security Act.
d This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Early Childhood.
e These amounts shall be from local funds. The (L) notation applies to these amounts.
f Of this amount, $2,845,358(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and $251,180 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant.
PAGE 43-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
g Of these amounts, $97,234,872(I) $99,880,165(I) shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, $18,548,592 shall be from the Title XX Social Services Block Grant, $3,886,129(I)
shall be from Title IV-B, Subpart 1, of the Social Security Act, and $2,803,645 shall be from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant. These amounts were assumed
in developing the appropriated fund source amounts in these line items. The amount from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act is reflected pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B),
C.R.S., and shall be used in determining the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
h For informational purposes, this amount includes $7,355,339 that is anticipated to be initially held out from state and federal funds that are allocated to county departments of social
services for the administration and provision of child welfare services, including the following estimated amounts: $3,208,511 for parental fee reimbursements to counties pursuant to
Section 26-5-104 (2), C.R.S., $2,750,328 for transportation services for foster children and youth pursuant to Section 22-32-138, C.R.S., $950,000 for department-approved child welfare
services that promote the safety and well-being of Native American children and youth, $346,500 for a statewide insurance policy for county-administered foster homes, and $100,000
for contractual services related to the allocation of funds among counties. The remaining $406,102,621 includes the state and federal funds to be allocated to county departments of social
services pursuant to Section 26-5-104, C.R.S., the estimated local share of child welfare services expenditures, and federal Medicaid funds estimated to be available to county departments
of social services for certain expenditures.
i This amount shall be from the Child Welfare Prevention and Intervention Services Cash Fund created in Section 26-5-104 (7)(a)(I), C.R.S.
j This amount shall be from the Title IV-E Administrative Costs Cash Fund created in Section 26-2-102.5 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S.
k This amount shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and is reflected for informational purposes pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(B), C.R.S., and shall be used in
determining the amount to be deposited to the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund pursuant to Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
l This amount shall be from the Collaborative Management Cash Fund created in Section 24-1.9-104 (1), C.R.S.
m This amount shall be from the Collaborative Management Cash Fund created in Section 24-1.9-104 (1), C.R.S.
n This amount shall be from Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, including an estimated $2,005,936 for the Chafee Foster Care Independence Program and $719,688 for the Education
and Training Voucher Program.
o This amount shall be from the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act state grant.
p This amount shall be from the Excess Federal Title IV-E Reimbursements Cash Fund created in Section 26-1-111 (2)(d)(II)(C), C.R.S.
q This amount shall be from the Foster Youth Successful Transition to Adulthood Grant Program Fund created in Section 19-7-314 (2), C.R.S.
r Of this amount, an estimated $284,167 shall be from the Child Welfare Licensing Cash Fund created in Section 26-6-907 (4)(b), C.R.S., and an estimated $64,594 shall be from the
Records and Reports Fund created in Section 19-1-307 (2.5)(b), C.R.S.
s This amount shall be from the High-acuity Treatment and Services Cash Fund creased in Section 26-5-104 (7.5)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART VIII
(HUMAN SERVICES) $2,535,292,844 $1,280,556,281 $436,847,172a $229,182,276b $588,707,115c
$2,540,680,012 $1,284,013,692 $436,131,636a $591,352,408e
PAGE 44-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $147,566,684 $146,851,148 contains an (L) notation and $284,356,744 $283,641,208 contains an (I) notation and are included for informational purposes only.
b Of this amount, $1,986,194 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
c Of this amount, $347,135,337 $349,780,630 contains an (I) notation and is included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 45-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

SECTION 3. Appropriation to the department of human
services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, amend section 32 (3) of chapter 230, (HB 25-1154), as
follows:
Section 32. Appropriation - adjustments to 2025 long bill.
(3) To implement this act, the reappropriated funds appropriation made
in the annual general appropriation act for the 2025-26 state fiscal year to
the department of human services for use by the Colorado commission for
the deaf, hard of hearing, and deafblind is decreased by $3,413,703, AND
THE RELATED FTE IS DECREASED BY 13.8 FTE. This appropriation is from
reappropriated funds received from the department of regulatory agencies
for use by the public utilities commission for the Colorado commission
for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deafblind cash fund.
SECTION 4. Appropriation to the department of human
services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, amend section 33 (3) introductory portion, (3)(a), and (5)
introductory portion, of chapter 230, (HB 25-1154), as follows:
Section 33. Appropriation. (3) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$4,958,625 is appropriated to the department of human services. This
appropriation is from the Colorado division for the deaf, hard of hearing,
and deafblind cash fund created in section 26-21-107 (1), C.R.S. To
implement this act, the department may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $4,891,755 for the communication services for people with
disabilities enterprise, which amount is based on an assumption that the
enterprise will require an additional 3.0 FTE 16.8 FTE; and
(5) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year, $21,467 is appropriated to
the department of revenue. This appropriation is from the prepaid
wireless trust TELEPHONE DISABILITY ACCESS CHARGE cash fund created
in section 40-17-104 (2)(e)(II), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
department may use this appropriation as follows:
PAGE 46-HOUSE BILL 26-1157

SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 47-HOUSE BILL 26-1157